Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Automated kiosk" means a self-serve interactive machine that purchases secondhand electronic devices.

(2) "Loan period" means the period of time from the date the loan is made until the date the loan is paid off, the loan is in default, or the loan is refinanced and new loan documents are issued, including all grace or extension periods.

(3) "Melted metals" means metals derived from metal junk or precious metals that have been reduced to a melted state from other than ore or ingots which are produced from ore that has not previously been processed.

(4) "Metal junk" means any metal that has previously been milled, shaped, stamped, or forged and that is no longer useful in its original form, except precious metals.

(5) "Nonmetal junk" means any nonmetal, commonly discarded item that is worn out, or has outlasted its usefulness as intended in its original form except nonmetal junk does not include an item made in a former period which has enhanced value because of its age.

(6) "Pawnbroker" means every person engaged, in whole or in part, in the business of loaning money on the security of pledges of personal property, or deposits or conditional sales of personal property, or the purchase or sale of personal property.

(7) "Precious metals" means gold, silver, and platinum.

(8) "Secondhand dealer" means every person engaged in whole or in part in the business of purchasing, selling, trading, consignment selling, or otherwise transferring for value, secondhand property including metal junk, melted metals, precious metals, whether or not the person maintains a fixed place of business within the state. Secondhand dealer also includes persons or entities conducting business, more than three times per year, at flea markets or swap meets. Secondhand dealer also includes persons or entities operating an automated kiosk.

(9) "Secondhand precious metal dealer" means any person or entity engaged in whole or in part in the commercial activity or business of purchasing, selling, trading, consignment selling, or otherwise transferring for value, more than three times per year, secondhand property that is a precious metal, whether or not the person or entity maintains a permanent or fixed place of business within the state, or engages in the business at flea markets or swap meets. The terms "precious metal" and "secondhand property," for purposes of transactions by a secondhand precious metal dealer, do not include: (a) Gold, silver, or platinum coins, or other precious metal coins, that are legal tender, or precious metal coins that have numismatic or precious metal value, (b) gold, silver, platinum, or other precious metal bullion, or (c) gold, silver, platinum, or other precious metal dust, flakes, or nuggets.

(10) "Secondhand property" means any item of personal property offered for sale which is not new, including metals in any form, except postage stamps, coins that are legal tender, bullion in the form of fabricated hallmarked bars, used books, and clothing of a resale value of seventy-five dollars or less, except furs.

(11) "Transaction" means a pledge, or the purchase of, or consignment of, or the trade of any item of personal property by a pawnbroker or a secondhand dealer from a member of the general public.

[ 2017 c 169 s 1. Prior: 2011 c 289 s 2; 1995 c 133 s 1; 1991 c 323 s 1; 1985 c 70 s 1; 1984 c 10 s 1; 1981 c 279 s 3; 1909 c 249 s 235; RRS s 2487. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: (i) 1909 c 249 s 236; RRS s 2488, now codified as RCW 19.60.015. (ii) 1939 c 89 s 1; RRS s 2488-1, now codified as RCW 19.60.065.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 289: "The legislature finds:

(1) The market price of gold has increased significantly in recent years and there has been a proliferation of secondhand dealers, including temporary, transient secondhand businesses, engaging in "cash for gold" type precious metal transactions. Frequently, these "cash for gold" type operations are operated by persons desiring to exploit unsuspecting consumers based on current market conditions;

(2) The increasing number of "cash for gold" type transactions in communities and neighborhoods throughout Washington has been linked to increased crimes involving the theft of gold and other precious metal objects, including home burglaries, robberies, and other crimes, resulting in depressed home values and other threats to the health, safety, and welfare of Washington state residents; and

(3) With the growing number of precious metal transactions, there is a corresponding significant increase in the number of "cash for gold" type storefront businesses, including temporary, transient secondhand businesses, in Washington state which may not be consistent with the quality of life and personal security sought by communities and neighborhoods and the state as a whole.

Therefore, to better protect legitimate owners, consumers, and secondhand dealers, the legislature intends to establish and implement stricter standards relating to transactions involving property consisting of gold and other precious metals." [ 2011 c 289 s 1.]